Maryland, session 2025, SB0753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–218.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AIRCRAFT DETECTION LIGHTING SYSTEM” MEANS A
SENSOR–BASED SYSTEM DESIGNED TO:
(I) DETECT AN AIRCRAFT APPROACHING AN OBSTRUCTION OR
GROUP OF OBSTRUCTIONS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0753*

SENATE BILL 753
(II) AUTOMATICALLY ACTIVATE OBSTRUCTION LIGHTS UNTIL
THE AIRCRAFT HAS DEPARTED THE AREA.
(3) “OFFSHORE WIND TRANSMISSION PROJECT” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) “QUALIFIED OFFSHORE WIND PROJECT” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, ANY WIND TURBINE AND ACCESSORY
INSTALLATION CONSTRUCTED IN CONNECTION WITH A QUALIFIED OFFSHORE WIND
PROJECT OR AN OFFSHORE WIND TRANSMISSION PROJECT SHALL INCLUDE THE
INSTALLATION OF AN AIRCRAFT DETECTION LIGHTING SYSTEM APPROVED BY THE
FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION.
(C) A PERSON THAT OWNS OR OPERATES A QUALIFIED OFFSHORE WIND
PROJECT OR AN OFFSHORE WIND TRANSMISSION PROJECT CONSTRUCTED BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2025, THAT IS NOT EQUIPPED WITH AN AIRCRAFT DETECTION
LIGHTING SYSTEM APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION
SHALL:
(1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO
THE FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION FOR APPROVAL TO INSTALL ON EACH
WIND TURBINE AND ANY ACCESSORY INSTALLATION ASSOCIATED WITH THE
PROJECT AN AIRCRAFT DETECTION LIGHTING SYSTEM; AND
(2) COMMENCE INSTALLATION OF THE AIRCRAFT DETECTION
LIGHTING SYSTEM ON EACH WIND TURBINE AND ANY ACCESSORY INSTALLATION
ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROJECT WITHIN 3 MONTHS AFTER THE FEDERAL AVIATION
ADMINISTRATION APPROVES AND CERTIFIES THE SYSTEM.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.